Texas, session 892, HB244.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 201.611, Transportation Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 201.611.  [COORDINATION OF] FLOOD CONTROL. (a) In the construction of its highway projects, the department shall: (1)  coordinate with local flood control authorities to minimize the impact of flooding; and (2)  add stormwater outfalls and other appropriate flood control measures to the project. (b)  In adding flood control measures under Subsection (a)(2), the department shall take into consideration existing, proposed, and expected roadways in reasonable proximity to the highway project. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.